src/fst/morphology/affixes/verbs.lexc
!! # Verb inflection in Vepsian
! ---

!! ## Lexica from the *stems* file

!! ### Irregular verbs
! ei:
LEXICON V_EI
!! @LEXNAME@ all forms of the *ei* verb
+Aux+Neg+Sg1:e%>n K ;
+Aux+Neg+Sg2:e%>d K ;
+Aux+Neg+Sg3:e%>i K ;
+Aux+Neg+Pl1:e%>m K ;
+Aux+Neg+Pl2:e%>t K ;
+Aux+Neg+Pl3:e%>i K ; !Is there any other variant

+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Sg2:ala K ;
+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Sg3:algha K ;
+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Pl1:alga%>m K ;
+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Pl2:alga%>t K ;
+Aux+Neg+Imprt+Pl3:algha K ;

!! ### Regular verbs

LEXICON V_ada/ab/i/agaha !! largest verb group vedada:ved (even number of syllables in stem)
!! @LEXNAME@ =  vedada:ved
!V_VEDADA 
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:a ACT_COND_type ;
:a ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:a VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:a V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:a INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ada/ab/i/agha !! split from largest verb group vedada:ved (even number of syllables in stem)
!! armahtagha odd number of syllables in stem
!! @LEXNAME@ =  armahtada:armaht
!V_ 
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:a ACT_COND_type ;
:a ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:a VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:a V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:a INF_da ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ata/ab/oi/akaha
!! @LEXNAME@ =  ahjata:ahj
! V_??
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg,
+Der/NomAg+PrsPrc:a%>jA1 K ; ! This will have to be AdjTag or something

:a ACT_COND_type ;
:a ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:a V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;

:a VNONFIN_m ;

:a INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:o ACT_IND_PRT ;! has i at affix

LEXICON V_da/vab/voi/gaha
!! @LEXNAME@ =  kaida:kai
! V_
: INF_da ;
:va V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg,
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:va N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present stems20241109

:va ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;

:va VNONFIN_m ;

+Der/NomAg+PrsPrc:a%>jA1 K ; ! This will have to be AdjTag or something
!! preterite stem vowel
:vo ACT_IND_PRT ;! has i at affix

LEXICON V_da/ab/oi/gaha
!! @LEXNAME@ =  nagrda:nagr
! V_
: INF_da ;
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present

:a ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

: V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;

:a VNONFIN_m ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:o ACT_IND_PRT ;! has i at affix

LEXICON V_ada/ab/oi/agaha
!! @LEXNAME@ =  jagada:jag
! V_JAGADA
:a INF_da ;
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with ‹e› present

:a ACT_COND_type ;
:a ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:a V-ConsonantStem_d/g ;

:a VNONFIN_m ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:o ACT_IND_PRT ;! has i at affix

!LEXICON V_JAGADA 
!!! @LEXNAME@ =  jagada:jag (adding a to prt and a elsewhere)
!:o V-VowelStem-PRT ;
!:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!:a V-ConsonantStem ;
!:a INDPRS3 ;
!:a INF_da ;
!:a PRFPRC_nu ;

LEXICON V_da/b/i/gaha
!! @LEXNAME@ =  sanuda:sanu
! V_JODA
: INF_da ;
: V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N: N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with

: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
: V-ConsonantStem_t/g ;

: VNONFIN_m ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! has i at affix

LEXICON V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha
!! @LEXNAME@ =  joda:jo
! V_JODA
: INF_da ;
: V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N: N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with

: ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
: V-ConsonantStem_t/gha ;

: VNONFIN_m ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! has i at affix

LEXICON V_ta/ab/i/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = ülenzoitta:ülenzoit, čorskta:čorsk
! V_??
! preceding vowel required
:a V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:a N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

:a ACT_COND_type ;
: ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

+Der/NomAg+PrsPrc:a%>jA1 K ; ! This will have to be AdjTag or something

: VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is on
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
: ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i
! REFL_IND_PRT ; ACT_IND_PRT_PERS ! has i at affix

LEXICON V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = avaita:avai, avaidab avaiži
! V_AVAITA
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:da V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:da N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:da ACT_COND_type ; 
:da ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;
:da VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:ž ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ta/dab/zi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = amunta:amun
! V_AMUNTA, kerata:kera
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:da V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:da N_TEGII ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:da ACT_COND_type ;
:da ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:da VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
 V-ConsonantStem_t/k ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
: INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:z ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_ata/tab/zi/kaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = saubata:saub %^DEVOICE
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:%^DEVOICE%>ta V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:%^DEVOICE%>ta N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:%^DEVOICE%>ta ACT_COND_type ;
:%^DEVOICE%>ta ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:%^DEVOICE%>ta VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:a V-ConsonantStem_te/tud/tas ;
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_kaha/koi ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:a INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:%^DEVOICE%>s ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i

LEXICON V_eta/DVteb/DVsi/ekaha
!! @LEXNAME@ = langeta:lang %^DEVOICE , cf. saubata
! V_??
!! preceding vowel always required for affix
:%^DEVOICE%>te V-VowelStem-PRS ;
!! refl-ind-prs, act-imprt-sg2, act-ind-prs, ind-sg-conneg
+Der+Der/NomAg+N:%^DEVOICE%>ti N_KACUI ;! this will need its own work with

!! sometimes requires preceding vowel
:%^DEVOICE%>t ACT_COND_type ;
:%^DEVOICE%>te ACT_PRFPRC_type_nu ;

:%^DEVOICE%>te VNONFIN_m ;

!!consonant stem if there is one takes both te, tes,... and kaha, koi
:%^DEVOICE V-ConsonantStem_te/tud/tas ;
:e V-ConsonantStem_kaha/koi ;
! refl-imprt-sg2, refl-ind-prs-sg-conneg

!! problems with tta, ta, da
:e INF_ta ;

!! preterite stem vowel
:%^DEVOICE%>s ACT_IND_PRT ;! gets i
