src/fst/morphology/stems/verbs.lexc
LEXICON verbs
azegduda+V:azegdu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
biraita+V:birai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
bulʼaita+V:bulʼai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
buzaita+V:buzai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
dudaita+V:dudai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
ehttuda+V:ehttu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
ei+V: V_EI ;
fuzaita+V:fuzai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
hahkištuda+V:hahkištu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
hajotada+V:hajot V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
heitatada+V:heitat V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
heleita+V:helei V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
helʼdüda+V:helʼdü V_da/b/i/gaha ;
higestuda+V:higestu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
hihkaita+V:hihkai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
hirnuda+V:hirnu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
huraita+V:hurai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
hämähtuda+V:hämähtu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
höpsaita+V:höpsai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
höštutada+V:höštut V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
ilʼmestuda+V:ilʼmestu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
joda+V:jo V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
juraita+V:jurai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
jäda+V:jä V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
kabarta+V:kabar V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kaburta+V:kabur V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kacauta+V:kacau V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kahtenzuda+V:kahtenzu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
kalaita+V:kalai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
katkeita+V:katkei V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
kelotada+V:kelot V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
kelʼta+V:kelʼ V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kerata+V:kera V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kerduda+V:kerdu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
kirota+V:kiro V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kiruhtada+V:kiruht V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
kiškaita+V:kiškai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
kogota+V:kogo V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kokaita+V:kokai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
korgenzuda+V:korgenzu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
koverta+V:kover V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kubeita+V:kubei V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
kuluda+V:kulu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
kumarta+V:kumar V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kägeta+V:käge V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kärauta+V:kärau V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
kükištuda+V:kükištu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
langeta+Hom1+V:lang V_eta/DVteb/DVsi/ekaha ;
lepetada+V:lepet V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
lesktuda+V:lesktu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
ligota+V:ligo V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
likahtada+V:likaht V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
lipsaita+V:lipsai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
ližata+v1+V:liža V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
loda+V:lo V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
lopotada+V:lopot V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
lukauta+V:lukau V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
läikäita+V:läikäi V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
lämptuda+V:lämptu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
löda+V:lö V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
löuta+V:löu V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
macata+V:maca V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
magata+V:maga V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
mastarta+V:mastar V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
melata+V:mela V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
meletada+V:melet V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
muhata+V:muha V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
muigištuda+V:muigištu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
mujada+v1+V:muj V_ada/ab/i/agaha ;
mučkeita+V:mučkei V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
märgastada+V:märgast V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
möda+V:mö V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
norištuda+V:norištu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
näpsaita+V:näpsai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
näritada+V:närit V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
openuda+V:openu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
ozutada+V:ozut V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
paigaita+V:paigai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
parata+V:para V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
pačaktuda+V:pačaktu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
pidada+V:pid V_ada/ab/i/agaha ;
pidatada+V:pidat V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
plongaita+V:plongai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
polʼvištuda+V:polʼvištu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
putkotada+V:putkot V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
pöruda+V:pöru V_da/b/i/gaha ;
rebitada+V:rebit V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
ribaita+V:ribai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
rušitada+V:rušit V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
räkištuda+V:räkištu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
räzäita+V:räzäi V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
sabutada+V:sabut V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
sada+V:sa V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
sebata+V:seba V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
seižutada+V:seižut V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
siništuda+V:siništu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
sobitada+V:sobit V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
sulada+V:sul V_ada/ab/i/agaha ;
sulata+V:sula V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
söda+V:sö V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
sündutada+V:sündut V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
taraita+V:tarai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
tervehtada+V:terveht V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
teta+V:te V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
tinehtuda+V:tinehtu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
toda+V:to V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
torta+V:tor V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
tuhaita+V:tuhai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
tulleitada+V:tulleit V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
tühjištuda+V:tühjištu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
umbištada+V:umbišt V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
uuda+V:uu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
val’l’astada+V:val’l’ast V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
varata+V:vara V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
vareita+V:varei V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
vaumištada+V:vaumišt V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
veda+V:ve V_1Syl_da/b/i/gha ;
vedada+V:ved V_ada/ab/i/agaha ;! test with V_ada/ab/i/agaha
verduda+V:verdu V_da/b/i/gaha ;
vimata+V:vima V_ta/dab/zi/kaha ;
viritada+V:virit V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
vägestada+V:vägest V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
üldüda+V:üldü V_da/b/i/gaha ;
čileita+V:čilei V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
čomitada+V:čomit V_ada/ab/i/agha ;
šihaita+V:šihai V_ta/dab/zhi/kaha ;
